lexicon.lexc
+NID+Poss+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:imiwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Poss+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:iminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Poss+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:imiban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Poss+Sg+3PlObvPoss:iminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Poss+Sg+3PlProxPoss:imiwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Poss+Sg+3SgObvPoss:iminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Poss+Sg+3SgProxPoss:im EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Pl+3PlObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:iwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:iwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Pl+3SgObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:ibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:ibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Sg+3PlObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:iwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:iban EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Sg+3PlObvPoss:iniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Sg+3PlProxPoss:iwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Sg+3SgObvPoss:iniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NID+Sg+3SgProxPoss: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NID, Class: NID_Cw                                         !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NID_Class=NID_Cw_Boundary
0:%>%> NID_Class=NID_Cw_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NID, Class: NID_Cw                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NID_Class=NID_Cw_Flags
@R.Prefix.G@ NID_Class=NID_Cw_Flags_Prefix=G ;
@R.Prefix.N@ NID_Class=NID_Cw_Flags_Prefix=N ;
@R.Prefix.W@ NID_Class=NID_Cw_Flags_Prefix=W ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NID, Class: NID_Cw                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=N                                           !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NID_Class=NID_Cw_Flags_Prefix=N
@U.Order.Other@ NID_Class=NID_Cw_Prefix=N_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NID, Class: NID_Cw, Prefix: N, Order: Other                !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NID_Stems
gidigw:gidigw2 NID_Class=NID_Cw_Boundary ;
katigw:katigw2 NID_Class=NID_Cw_Boundary ;
pigemagw:pigemagw2 NID_Class=NID_Cw_Boundary ;
shkiinzhigw:shkiinzhigw2 NID_Class=NID_Cw_Boundary ;
